Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3912.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6060.9e of Title 36, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Every individual or group health benefit plan, including the
State and Education Employees Group Health Insurance Plan, that is
offered, issued, or renewed in this state on or after January 1,
2027, that provides medical and surgical benefits with respect to
Req. No. 14214 Page 1

the treatment of cancer and other conditions treated by chemotherapy
or radiation therapy shall provide coverage for scalp cooling
systems when prescribed by a licensed physician for the prevention
of chemotherapy-induced alopecia.
B. Coverage shall include the cost of scalp cooling system,
necessary supplies, fitting and monitoring during the course of
chemotherapy treatment. Scalp cooling shall be considered supportive
cancer care and shall not be deemed cosmetic, experimental, or
investigational when used in accordance with this act.
C. Coverage provided under this act may be subject to annual
deductibles, coinsurance, or copayments as may be deemed appropriate
by the Insurance Commissioner and as are consistent with those
established for other benefits within a given plan.
D. A health benefit plan shall provide notice to each insured
or enrollee under the plan regarding the coverage required by this
section in the evidence of coverage of the plan and shall provide
additional written notice of the coverage to the insured or enrollee
as follows:
1. In the next mailing made by the plan to the insured or
enrolled employee;
2. As part of any yearly informational packet sent to the
enrollee; or
3. Not later than December 1, 2026;
whichever is earlier.
Req. No. 14214 Page 2

E. As used in this act:
1. "Health benefit plan" means any plan or arrangement as
defined in subsection C of Section 6060.4 of this title. However,
this section shall not apply to policies or certificates issued to
individuals or groups with fifty (50) or fewer employees or plans
offered under the State Medicaid Program; and
2. "Scalp cooling system" means a medical device or system
designed to reduce hair loss associated with chemotherapy.
F. This act shall not apply to individual or group health
benefit plans governed exclusively by federal law.
G. The Oklahoma Health Care Authority shall include scalp
cooling systems as a covered benefit for eligible Medicaid
recipients undergoing chemotherapy.
H. The Insurance Commissioner shall promulgate any rules
necessary to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14214 MJ 01/13/26






Req. No. 14214 Page 3